Utah statutes.
58-5a-303.   Terms of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.
(1)  The division shall issue all licenses under this chapter in accordance
with the two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  A renewal period for a
license may be extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain
established renewal cycles or to change an established renewal cycle.
(2)  At the time of renewal the licensee shall show satisfactory evidence of
renewal requirements established by rule, including completion of continuing
education as required under this chapter.
(3)  A license issued under this chapter expires on the expiration date shown
on the license unless renewed prior to that date by the licensee in accordance
with Section 58-1-308.
